South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S48.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The proposed amendment to the Constitution of the United States of America, providing that equality of rights under the law must not be denied or abridged on account of sex, is hereby ratified. SECTION 2.  Certified copies of this resolution must be forwarded immediately upon enactment by the Secretary of State of South Carolina to the Archivist of the United States, National Archives and Records Administration, Washington, D.C., to the President of the United States Senate, and to the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives. ----XX----